Rhode Island, session 2025, SB602.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-143-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-143 entitled "Science
and Technology Advisory Council" as enacted by Chapter 281 of the 2006 Public Laws is hereby
repealed:
§ 42-143-1. Council established. [As enacted by P.L. 2006, ch. 281.]
There is hereby created a Rhode Island science and technology advisory council to consist
of thirteen (13) members: three (3) of whom shall be appointed by the governor, with two (2) of
those so appointed to be designated by the governor as co-chairs; six (6) of whom shall be the
members of the science and technology advisory council, as established by executive order 05-07;
one of whom shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; one of whom shall
be appointed by the house majority leader; and one of whom shall be appointed by the president of
the senate; and one of whom shall be appointed by the senate majority leader. The membership of
said council shall receive no compensation for their services. The council shall support the state’s
research institutions, promote entrepreneurial development, enable all organizations to become
more innovative, and perform any other advisory functions as the legislature may designate.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002169/SUB A
========